North Dakota, session 69, HB1189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 27-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Publication of judicial improvement survey results.
The supreme court shall publish the results of any judicial improvement survey in the official
newspaper of each county within the judicial officer's judicial district.
Page No. 1 25.0669.01000